Delaware, session 153, SB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 41, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4150. Title IX requirements. (a) Any school that receives federal funding and is subject to the requirements of Title IX shall ensure that students, staff, and faculty are protected from sex-based discrimination, including sex-based harassment. (b) Any school that receives federal funding and is subject to the requirements of Title IX shall prominently post on their school webpage a section regarding the schoolâs responsibilities to Title IX. The webpage must contain all of the following: (1) A brief description of the roles and duties of Title IX administrators: a. The roles and duties of a Title IX coordinator. b. The roles and duties of a Title IX investigator. c. The roles and duties of a Title IX decision-maker. (2) The name, email address, office address, and phone number of the Title IX coordinator for the school. (3) A link to the schoolâs policy manual related to Title IX. (4) The right of a student, staff, and faculty to file a complaint to start an investigation into a report of sex-based discrimination, including sex-based harassment. (5) A link to the appropriate form to make a complaint. (6) A link to the most recent version of the frequently asked questions webpage regarding Title IX from the U.S. Department of Educationâs Office for Civil Rights. (7) The right of a student, staff, and faculty who reports sex-based discrimination, including sex-based harassment, to receive supportive measures, regardless of whether there is an investigation. (8) Provide an explanation of and list of examples of supportive measures that may be available to assist students, staff, and faculty who report sex-based harassment. (c) At the beginning of the academic school year, every Title IX coordinator shall provide a written reminder to all school staff and faculty regarding the schoolâs policy for reporting sex-based discrimination, including sex-based harassment, and how to make a report pertaining to sex-based discrimination or sex-based harassment. (d) Nothing in this section should be construed to require a school to establish an online website if the school does not already maintain one.